North Carolina, session 2025, SB247.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REDIRECT CRISIS PREGNANCY CENTER FUNDS TO EVIDENCE-BASED
MATERNAL AND INFANT HEALTH PROGRAMS
SECTION 1.(a) Section 9H.11 of S.L. 2023-134 is repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of six million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($6,250,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of six
million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($6,250,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to be used to support the expansion of evidence-based maternal and infant health
programs and services administered by the Department of Health and Human Services.
SECTION 1.(c) This Part becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART II. REQUIRE THE STATE AUDITOR TO CONDUCT AN AUDIT OF
CAROLINA PREGNANCY CARE FELLOWSHIP
SECTION 2. By March 1, 2026, the State Auditor shall conduct a financial statement
audit of Carolina Pregnancy Care Fellowship, a nonprofit corporation. The State Auditor shall
report the results of the audit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human
Services and the Fiscal Research Division.

PART III. ESTABLISH ADDITIONAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CRISIS
PREGNANCY CENTERS THAT RECEIVE STATE FUNDS
SECTION 3.(a) Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 131E-269.5. Crisis pregnancy centers; reporting requirements.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
*S247-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Crisis pregnancy center. – Any nonprofit organization that holds itself out as
providing services to pregnant women through pregnancy, birth, and the
postpartum period, including a birthing center, clinic, community-based
organization, or faith-based organization that holds itself out as providing
pregnancy counseling services, pregnancy testing, and other nonmedical
pregnancy services. The term does not include a hospital, as defined in
G.S. 131E-76, or an ambulatory surgical facility, as defined in G.S. 131E-106.
(2) Fiscal year. – The annual operating year of the crisis pregnancy center.
(3) State financial assistance. – State funds disbursed to a crisis pregnancy center
as a grant, cooperative agreement, noncash contribution, or direct
appropriation to a crisis pregnancy center.
(4) State funds. – As defined in G.S. 143C-1-1(d)(25).
(b) Reporting Requirements. – In addition to the reporting requirements specified in 09
NCAC 03M .0205, each crisis pregnancy center that is a recipient or subrecipient of any amount
of State financial assistance shall submit a report to the Department of Health and Human
Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the
Fiscal Research Division within 60 days after the end of the fiscal year in which the crisis
pregnancy center received State financial assistance. The report shall include all of the following
information with respect to the fiscal year in which the State financial assistance was received:
(1) The name of the center and each location where the center conducts business
or provides services.
(2) The total amount of State funds, federal funds, tax subsidies, or other
subsidies, if any, the center received, directly or indirectly, broken down by
location if the center conducts business or provides services at more than one
location.
(3) An explanation of whether the center is part of a larger umbrella organization
that operates within the State and, if so, the total amount of State and federal
funds or taxes or other subsidies, if any, the umbrella organization received,
directly or indirectly, broken down by location if the umbrella organization
conducts business or provides services at more than one location.
(4) An explanation of all services provided at the center and what services were
most frequently sought at the center, broken down by location if the center
conducts business or provides services at more than one location.
(5) The number of women who accessed services provided at the center during
the fiscal year, the geographic regions of the State where these women reside,
the distance from the center to the nearest licensed health care facility that
provides the same services offered at the center, the price of each service
offered at the center, and basic demographic information about each of the
women who accessed services provided at the center, including their race, age,
and marital status. Basic demographic information included in any report
required by this subdivision shall be published in the aggregate without any
personal identifying information.
(6) An explanation of whether the center holds itself out to the public, either in
person, through community participation or events, or through advertising or
websites, as a medical facility, health care facility, or other entity that provides
comprehensive counseling about all pregnancy options.
(7) An explanation of whether women seeking or accessing services at the center
are also seeking comprehensive counseling services about pregnancy options
or pregnancy services at a licensed health care facility and, if so, whether these
women have experienced a delay in receiving health care, including abortion
or the initiation of prenatal care, due to a visit to a center.
Page 2 Senate Bill 247-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) An explanation of whether the center enrolls women in any public benefits
programs or connects women to other services and, if so, identification of
which programs and services.
(9) The nature of information provided to clients or potential clients at the center
and an explanation of whether the center has operational manuals, handbooks,
or guidelines related to the provision of services to clients.
(10) The number of professional and volunteer staff who provide health care or
counseling services at the center who are licensed by the State of North
Carolina to provide such services, broken down by professional title and
location if the center has more than one location. In reporting this information,
the center shall specify the number of professional and volunteer staff who are
on-site at the center during regular business hours and whether the center
informs women whether the individuals on-site providing services are
licensed professionals or volunteers.
(11) A description of any health or other information the center collects from
women accessing the services of the center, how the center stores and uses
medical and other client records, and whether the medical records are in
compliance with federal and State law governing medical privacy."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 131E-269.5, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section,
applies to any crisis pregnancy center that receives State financial assistance on or after July 1,
2025. As used in this section, the terms "crisis pregnancy center" and "State financial assistance"
have the same meanings as in G.S. 131E-269.5, as enacted by subsection (a) of this section.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 247-First Edition Page 3